Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.235

Effect of merger or consolidation.

When such merger or consolidation has been effected:

(1) The several corporations party to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single corporation, which, in the case of a merger, shall be that corporation designated in the plan of merger as the surviving corporation, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation.

(2) The separate existence of all corporations party to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new corporation, shall cease.

(3) The surviving or new corporation shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities and powers, and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under this chapter.

(4) The surviving or new corporation shall thereupon and thereafter possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, whether of a public or a private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating corporations; all property, real, personal and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the corporations so merged or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such single corporation without further act or deed; and no title to any real estate, or any interest therein, vested in any of such corporations shall not revert nor be in any way impaired by reason of such merger or consolidation.

(5) The surviving or new corporation shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the corporations so merged or consolidated; and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such corporations may be prosecuted as if such merger or consolidation had not taken place, or such surviving or new corporation may be substituted in its place. No rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any such corporation shall be impaired by such merger or consolidation.

(6) In the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger; and, in the case of a consolidation, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and which are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this chapter shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new corporation.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 47.]